New York, session 2025-2026, A919.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 21-a of the 2 social services law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending 3 the social services law relating to requiring electronic benefit trans- 4 fer systems to provide for benefit recipients to be able to cancel, lock 5 or unlock a credit or debit card associated with electronic benefit 6 transfer services, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8662-A 7 and A. 9269-B, is amended to read as follows: 8 (c) Any interactive voice response system associated with an electron- 9 ic benefit transfer system which benefit recipients may call for support 10 or assistance shall include an option for benefit recipients to [report 11 fraud and] cancel such benefit recipient's electronic benefit transfer 12 [credit or debit] card permanently or lock or unlock such benefit recip- 13 ient's electronic benefit transfer [credit or debit] card [indefinitely. 14 Provided, further, any interactive voice response system associated with 15 an electronic benefit transfer system which benefit recipients may call 16 for support or assistance shall also allow for benefit recipients to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02709-01-5 A. 919 2 1 lock such benefit recipient's credit or debit card for out of state 2 purchases only or for online purchases only]. 3 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the social 4 services law relating to requiring electronic benefit transfer systems 5 to provide for benefit recipients to be able to cancel, lock or unlock a 6 credit or debit card associated with electronic benefit transfer 7 services, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8662-A and A. 8 9269-B, is amended to read as follows: 9 § 2. This act shall take effect [six months] one year after it shall 10 have become a law. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 12 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 13 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the social 14 services law relating to requiring electronic benefit transfer systems 15 to provide for benefit recipients to be able to cancel, lock or unlock a 16 credit or debit card associated with electronic benefit transfer 17 services, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8662-A and A. 18 9269-B, takes effect.